Utah statutes.
57-18-6.   Enforcement.
(1)  A conservation easement may be enforced or protected by injunctive relief
granted by a court in a proceeding initiated by the grantor or holder of the
easement.
(2)  In addition to injunctive relief, the holder of a conservation easement
is entitled to recover money damages.
(3)  The holder of a conservation easement may enter the real property
burdened or benefited by the easement at reasonable times and in a reasonable
manner to ensure compliance.
